Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.64.200

Eminent domain by cities.

A code city may exercise all powers relating to eminent domain as authorized by chapters 8.12 and 8.28 RCW in accordance with the procedures therein prescribed and subject to any limitations therein provided.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.64.200.]